Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-801
United States Space Command Headquarters Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The United States Space Command Headquarters Assistance Fund is created. The fund shall be used to contribute to the construction of the United States Space Command headquarters if the State of Nebraska is selected as the site for the headquarters. The Adjutant General of the State of Nebraska shall administer the fund. The fund shall consist of transfers authorized by the Legislature and any gifts, grants, or bequests from any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources, for such purposes. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB384, § 27.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.